Louisiana, session 2026, HB933.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:38.1 and 40(18) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§38.1. Commemorative Birth Certificate
A. The department shall issue upon request and upon payment of an
additional fee as prescribed under R.S. 40:40(18) a commemorative birth certificate
representing that the birth of the person named thereon is recorded in the Vital
Records Registry. The state registrar may establish procedures for issuing
commemorative birth certificates; except that a commemorative birth certificate shall
be issued in a form consistent with the need to protect the integrity of vital records,
including secure measures designed to prevent tampering, counterfeiting, or
otherwise duplicating the birth certificate for fraudulent purposes pursuant to the
federal “Intelligence Reform and Terrorism Prevention Act of 2004”, 5 U.S.C. 301.
B. The commemorative birth certificate shall be suitable for display and may
bear the seal of the state and be signed by the governor.
C. A commemorative birth certificate shall have the same status as evidence
as that of a certified copy of a birth certificate.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 933 ENROLLED
§40. Fees for certified copies
Fees for filing, searching, and furnishing copies of vital records shall be
determined as follows:
* * *
(18) A fee of fifty dollars for a commemorative certificate of birth issued in
accordance with R.S. 40:38.1. Of this fifty dollars, twenty dollars shall be retained
by the state registrar to produce and administer commemorative certificates, and
thirty dollars shall be forwarded to the office on women’s health and community
health.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.